Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 5 GENERAL PROVISIONS
23-5-106.5. Authority of governing boards - student applications - criminal and disciplinary history inquiry - exceptions - definitions.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Academic institution" means any elementary or secondary school or any postsecondary education institution.

"Conviction" means a conviction by a jury verdict or by entry of a verdict or acceptance of a guilty plea or a plea of nolo contendere by a court. "Conviction" does not include a plea to a deferred judgment and sentence until the deferred judgment and sentence is revoked.

"State institution of higher education" means a state institution of higher education as defined in section 23-18-102 (10).

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the governing board of any state institution of higher education shall not inquire into, or require disclosure of, an applicant's criminal history, or disciplinary history at another academic institution, on any form of application, including electronic applications, for admission to the state institution of higher education.

The application or instructions for the application for admission to a state institution of higher education must inform an applicant of the applicant's rights pursuant to this section, including the right to appeal a decision made based on any information required to be disclosed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, and that, pursuant to section 24-72-702, the applicant is not required to disclose any information contained in sealed records.

A state institution of higher education that accepts a form of application that may also be used to apply for admission to any other institution of higher education shall not consider any information provided by the student on that application that the state institution of higher education is prohibited from inquiring into pursuant to this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a state institution of higher education may consider criminal conviction history if information pertaining to such history is provided on an application that is designed by a national application service, tailored for admission to a specific degree program, and used by postsecondary education institutions in other states. An applicant denied admission based on information provided on an application pursuant to this subsection (2)(c)(II) that an institution would otherwise be prohibited from inquiring into pursuant to this section has the right to appeal that decision pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section.

Except as authorized pursuant to any other section of law, the governing board of any state institution of higher education may not obtain the criminal history, or disciplinary history at another academic institution, of an applicant at any time prior to admitting the applicant.

A state institution of higher education may not use as the basis for rejection of an applicant any information that the institution is prohibited from collecting pursuant to this section, regardless of how that information is obtained.

Notwithstanding any requirement in this section, the governing board of a state institution of higher education, on any form of application for admission, may inquire into any of the following:

An applicant's prior convictions for stalking, sexual assault, and domestic violence;

An applicant's prior convictions, within five years before submitting the application, for assault, kidnapping, voluntary manslaughter, or murder;

An applicant's prior disciplinary history at another academic institution for stalking, sexual assault, and domestic violence;

Any criminal charges pending against the applicant; and

An applicant's educational records related to academic performance.

Any additional review by a state institution of higher education of an otherwise qualified applicant based on information provided by the applicant pursuant to subsection (3) of this section must be completed within a reasonable period of time.

An applicant denied admission based on information provided by the applicant pursuant to subsection (2)(c)(II) or (3) of this section has the right to appeal that decision within the state institution of higher education. The governing board of each state institution of higher education shall adopt policies and procedures for appeals made pursuant to this section.

Each state institution of higher education shall publish any policy enacted pursuant to this section on the institution's publicly accessible website and shall file such policies with the commission. A state institution of higher education shall notify the commission at least thirty days before enacting any change to a policy filed with the commission.

Nothing in this section prohibits a state institution of higher education from providing an applicant with information or counseling concerning licensure in a profession that may result from a course of study.

A state institution of higher education may inquire into an admitted applicant's criminal history when obtaining information pertaining to participation in campus life or student housing. If an institution elects to make such inquiries, the institution shall consider the following:

The nature and gravity of any criminal conduct and whether it bears a direct relationship to a particular aspect of a student's participation in campus life, including but not limited to campus residency and campus activities;

The time that has passed since the occurrence of any criminal conduct;

The age of the student at the time of the conduct underlying a criminal conviction;

Any evidence of rehabilitation or good conduct produced by the student; and

The benefit to the student of participating in campus life.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-170), ch. 285, p. 2651, § 2, effective May 1, 2020.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Ensuring Access to Higher Education Act") in SB 19-170, see section 1 of chapter 285, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

23-5-107. Authority of governing boards - parking.

The governing board of any state institution of higher education is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations providing for the operation and parking of vehicles upon the grounds, driveways, or roadways within the property under the control of the governing board. Such rules and regulations may include, but not be limited to, regulation and control of the following:

Assignment of parking spaces, designation of areas for parking, and regulation of the use of such spaces and areas including the assessment of charges therefor;

Prohibition or limitation of parking in the manner deemed necessary;

Removal of vehicles parked in violation of institutional rules and regulations, ordinances, or law at the expense of the violator;

Assessment of charges for violation of rules and regulations.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 1063, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-9.

23-5-108. Governing boards authorized to cede jurisdiction for enforcement of traffic laws.

The governing board of any state institution of higher education is authorized to cede jurisdiction to the town, city, city and county, or county in which the property under the control of the governing board is located for the enforcement of ordinances, resolutions, and laws pertaining to the operation of motor vehicles, subject to the acceptance of jurisdiction by the respective town, city, city and county, or county.

Upon acceptance of jurisdiction:

The town, city, city and county, or county has authority to enforce the provisions of ordinances, resolutions, or state law pertaining to the operation of motor vehicles on streets or highways within the property under the control of the governing board by means of the police and judicial powers established by resolution, ordinance, or law; except that such jurisdiction shall not conflict with the authority provided in section 23-5-107, as such is exercised by the governing board;

The ordinances and resolutions of the respective local authorities and state laws shall have the same force and effect on the driveways and roadways within the property under the control of the governing board as they have on the streets and highways within the jurisdiction of the local authorities;

The local authorities shall, upon recommendation of the governing board of any state institution of higher education or its designated officer, establish traffic control devices upon the property under the control of such institution, and, upon establishment, the devices shall have the same legal effect as provided in sections 42-4-112 and 42-4-603, C.R.S. The traffic control devices so established shall be installed at the expense of the institution.

Even though jurisdiction is ceded in the manner provided by this section, the authority to establish, close, change, alter, or limit access to the driveways or roadways within the property under the control of a governing board shall vest and remain with such governing board.

The jurisdiction of local authorities to enforce ordinances, resolutions, and laws pertaining to the operation of motor vehicles upon the property under the control of a state institution of higher education shall not be deemed to convey any right, title, or interest in the roadways and driveways of said property, and the jurisdiction over said roadways and driveways shall extend only to enforcement of such ordinances, resolutions, and laws. The state of Colorado reserves the right at all times to revoke the jurisdiction of local authorities granted by this section.

The governing board of any state institution of higher education is authorized to institute and carry out a system of registration of vehicle identification owned or operated by its students, faculty, and staff. By rule or regulation, the governing board may provide for the issuance of suitable vehicle identification insignia, its proper use, and requirements for attachment to the registered vehicle. Authority is also granted to provide for suspension of the registration and penalties, other than criminal penalties, upon suspension including, but not limited to, barring the vehicle from parking or driving on institution property. Reasonable charges may be assessed for registration and reinstatement upon suspension.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 1063, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-10.

L. 94:

(2)(c) amended, p. 2554, § 48, effective January 1, 1995.

23-5-109. Identification.

The governing board of any state institution of higher education is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations establishing a system of identification of students, faculty, and staff which may include provisions for penalties other than criminal penalties and provisions for disciplinary action for failure to display one's identification card upon request by an authorized official, possession of a false identification card, and alteration of an identification card. The authorized officials of such institution have authority to detain a person upon the property under the control of the institution for the purpose of obtaining proper identification if such person refuses to display his identification card or otherwise give adequate identification upon request by an authorized official.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 1064, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-11.

23-5-110. Medical personnel.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any person holding a license to practice medicine in this state may accept employment from any public or private university, college, junior or community college, school district, or private nonprofit school to examine and treat the students of such a university, college, or school, and, if no increase in staff or expenditures is required by the university, college, or school, the spouses of such students.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 1065, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-12.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1095, § 1, effective June 4.

23-5-111. Educational benefits for dependents of prisoners of war and military personnel missing in action - definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

p. 1319, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-13.

L. 79:

Entire section repealed, p. 830, § 2, effective June 19.

Cross references:

For present provisions concerning educational benefits for dependents of certain military personnel, see §§ 23-3.3-201 and 23-3.3-204.

23-5-111.4. Tuition for members of the National Guard - definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 831, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 778, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 88:

(3) amended, p. 858, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(3) amended, pp. 1154, 1142, §§ 4, 7, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2) to (5) amended and (6) to (9) added, p. 546, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 96:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 367, § 1, effective April 17; (3) amended, p. 11, § 1, effective August 7; (8) repealed, p. 1238, § 86, effective August 7.

L. 99:

(2)(a), (2)(b)(II), (2)(b)(IV), (2)(c), (3), (6), IP(7), and (7)(b) amended, p. 1138, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2002:

(2)(a), (2)(c), (4), (5), (6), IP(7), IP(7)(a), (7)(b), and (9) amended, p. 356, § 9, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 708, § 7, effective July 1, 2003.

L. 2004:

(2)(a.5) added and (9)(a) amended, pp. 1156, 1155, §§ 3, 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(a.5), (2)(b)(IV), (2)(d), (3), (5), (6), and IP(7) amended, p. 257, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4) repealed, p. 1622, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3)(a) amended, p. 371, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 2011:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1367, § 20, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 759, § 15, effective May 19; (3)(a) amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 426, § 11, effective July 1; (3)(a) amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1270, § 14, effective August 1.

L. 2016:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 145, § 17, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(3)(a) and (9)(a) amended, (SB 17-174), ch. 10, p. 32, § 2, effective March 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1228), ch. 103, p. 787, § 3, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 23-7.4-302 in 2018.

23-5-111.5. Educational benefits for dependents of deceased or permanently disabled National Guardsman - definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1107, § 1, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section repealed, p. 830, § 2, effective June 19.

Cross references:

For present provisions concerning educational benefits for dependents of certain National Guard personnel, see §§ 23-3.3-201 and 23-3.3-205.

23-5-112. Gifts and bequests to institutions of higher education - venture development investment funds.

All state institutions of higher education are authorized to receive gifts and bequests of money or property which may be tendered to any such institution by will or gift. The governing board of such institution is authorized, subject to the terms of any gift or bequest and to provisions of any applicable law, to hold such funds or property in trust or invest or sell them and use either principal or interest or the proceeds of sale for the benefit of such institutions or the students or others for whose benefit such institutions are conducted.

When a governing board of an institution of higher education is offered a gift of property, whether real or personal, which directly or indirectly involves significant ongoing expenditures, the institution shall require in connection therewith an endowment sufficient to fund such expenses. This subsection (2) shall not apply when the gift has been approved by the Colorado commission on higher education with the understanding that acceptance will require an allocation of state funding and the commission is satisfied that provision therefor can be made within available resources. The commission shall prepare a statement of procedures of review and of criteria to be applied in its review of any such gifts, which shall have the approval of the governor and joint budget committee.

Nonprofit entities such as foundations, institutes, and similar organizations organized for the sole benefit of one or more state institutions of higher education are entitled to receive gifts and bequests of money or property which may be tendered to any such entity by will or gift. Such gifts and bequests are subject to audit by the state auditor or the state auditor's designee. If the entity is entirely separate and apart from the institution, if no employees of the institution serve as staff or as voting members of the entity's board, and if the funds and accounts of the entity are entirely separate from those of the institution, such gifts and bequests are subject to annual audit to be performed by an independent accounting firm engaged by the entity if determined in advance to be satisfactory to the legislative audit committee. The state auditor shall have access to all of the accountant's work papers. If, alternatively, the separate relationship does not prevail, members and employees of the board of the entity may include staff members or employees of the institution, and such gifts and bequests are subject to audit by the state auditor or the state auditor's designee.

Each state institution of higher education may elect to establish a venture development investment fund for the purpose of facilitating the commercialization of research projects conducted at a research institution of the institution or a research institution that has an office of technology transfer. A venture development fund may be administered by a nonprofit entity such as a foundation, institute, or similar organization that is affiliated with the institution.

The purposes of a venture development investment fund established by a state institution of higher education pursuant to this section shall include, but need not be limited to, providing the following:

Capital for entrepreneurial programs that are associated with the institution;

Opportunities for students of the institution to gain experience in applying research to commercial activities;

Proof-of-concept funding for the purpose of transforming research and development concepts into commercially viable products or services; and

Entrepreneurial opportunities for persons who are interested in transforming research into viable commercial ventures that create jobs in Colorado.

Each state institution of higher education and each nonprofit entity, such as a foundation, institute, or similar organization, that is affiliated with a state institution of higher education is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, and donations to facilitate the establishment of a venture development investment fund.

Individuals, businesses, and other entities are encouraged to donate moneys to research institutions of state institutions of higher education for the purpose of advancing the commercialization of research projects at the research institutions.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 1321, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-1-14.

L. 2009:

(4) added, (HB 09-1242), ch. 345, p. 1809, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1398, § 58, effective May 25.

23-5-113. Collection of loans and outstanding obligations - state educational institutions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-30-202.4, C.R.S., the governing board of any state educational institution may promulgate rules and regulations relating to procedures for collecting any loans or other outstanding obligations owed to such institution. The institution may employ private counsel or a collection agency to handle the collection of any such loan or obligation. Employment of private counsel or a collection agency shall be in accordance with the rules and regulations, but in no event shall the fees paid to the private counsel or collection agency exceed forty percent of the amount recovered.

The institution is authorized to write off, release, or compromise any debt or obligation due the institution, but only in accordance with the rules and regulations applicable thereto.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 792, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1850, § 27, effective June 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

23-5-113.5. Prohibition on withholding transcripts and diplomas - postsecondary institution - remedy - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Administrator" means an administrator of the "Uniform Consumer Credit Code" designated pursuant to section 5-6-103.

"Debt" means any money, obligation, claim, or sum, due or owing, or alleged to be due or owing, from a current or former student, but does not include a fee charged to a current or former student for the actual cost of providing a transcript or diploma.

"Financial aid funds" means financial aid funds that a current or former student owes to a postsecondary institution under Title IV, or to the state, due to miscalculation, withdrawal, misinformation, or any other reason, not including the standard repayment of student loans.

"Postsecondary institution" means a public institution of higher education, as defined in section 23-4.5-102 (7); a private institution of higher education, as defined in section 23-18-102 (9); or a private occupational school, as defined in section 23-2-102 (13).

"Room and board fees" means any money, obligation, claim, or sum, due or owing, or alleged to be due or owing, from a current or former student for the provision of contractually agreed upon on-campus housing or meal services plans.

"Student loan ombudsperson" means the student loan ombudsperson designated in section 5-20-104.

A postsecondary institution may refuse to provide a transcript or diploma to a current or former student on the grounds that the student owes a debt for tuition, room and board fees, or financial aid funds.

Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, a postsecondary institution shall not refuse to provide a transcript or diploma to a current or former student:

On the grounds that the student owes a debt other than a debt for tuition, room and board fees, or financial aid funds; or

If the student can demonstrate that the transcript or diploma is needed for one of the following exemptions:

A job application;

Transferring to another postsecondary institution;

Applying for state, federal, or institutional financial aid;

Pursuit of opportunities in the military or National Guard; or

Pursuit of other postsecondary opportunities.

Subsection (2)(b)(II) of this section does not apply to a foreign student, as defined in section 23-1-113.5.

If a postsecondary institution provides a current or former student a transcript or diploma pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section, the postsecondary institution shall not:

Condition provision of the transcript or diploma on payment of a debt;

Charge a higher fee to obtain the transcript or diploma or provide less favorable treatment in response to the transcript or diploma request because the requesting current or former student owes a debt; or

Otherwise use transcript or diploma issuance as a tool for debt collection.

Each postsecondary institution shall adopt a policy that outlines the process by which a student may obtain a transcript or diploma and the circumstances under which a transcript or diploma may be withheld pursuant to subsection (2) of this section from a current or former student who owes a debt. At a minimum, the policy must include:

A reasonable process for verification of conditions a current or former student may demonstrate to receive an exemption pursuant to subsection (2) of this section;

An opportunity to establish a payment plan for the debt;

Identification of the point at which a student will no longer be able to register for classes due to the debt owed; and

Identification of the point at which a student may be subject to a transcript, diploma, or registration hold, including the time frames and amounts for which the holds are to be used and the lowest amount of debt at which the institution will assign the debt to a third-party collection agency.

The postsecondary institution shall post the policy described in subsection (4)(a) of this section and the procedures for filing a complaint with the student loan ombudsperson and the administrator on the postsecondary institution's website and provide the policy and the procedures to students as part of the information shared relating to the cost of attendance that includes any additional fees, financial aid, scholarships, or other information.

Beginning July 1, 2024, each postsecondary institution shall annually report to the department of higher education concerning transcript and registration holds, including:

The postsecondary institution's policy developed pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section;

The number of students for whom the postsecondary institution is withholding official transcripts, diplomas, and registration privileges; and

The number of past-due student accounts assigned to third-party collection agencies, including the number of students who are eligible for federal Pell grants.

Beginning January 2025, and each January thereafter, the department of higher education shall annually report on the information described in subsection (5)(a) of this section at the department's annual hearing pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2.

The student loan ombudsperson may provide information to the public regarding the limits described in this section on withholding a transcript or diploma. The student loan ombudsperson and the administrator may receive complaints from current or former students who have had a transcript withheld.

Beginning January 2025, and each January thereafter, the attorney general's office shall compile data on the complaints received by the student loan ombudsperson and the administrator pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section and annually report the data through the annual hearing for the department of law held pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1049), ch. 118, p. 549, § 1, effective April 21.

23-5-114. National direct student loans - authority to separately collect advances.

Each advance remitted to an individual by a state-supported institution of higher education pursuant to the terms of a national direct student loan program master agreement shall constitute a separate obligation for purposes of institutional collection procedures and jurisdictional limits under section 13-6-403, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 793, § 2, effective June 3.

23-5-115. Loans or outstanding obligations offset.

At times prescribed by the department of revenue, but not less frequently than annually, a state educational institution shall certify to the department of revenue information regarding persons who owe a loan repayment or other outstanding obligation to the institution, the amount of which has been determined to be owing as a result of a final agency determination or judicial decision pursuant to section 39-21-108 (3), C.R.S., or which has been reduced to judgment.

Such information shall include the name and social security number of the person owing the debt, the amount of the debt, and any other identifying information required by the department of revenue.

Upon notification by the department of revenue of amounts deposited with the state treasurer pursuant to section 39-21-108 (3), C.R.S., the state treasurer shall disburse such amounts to the appropriate state educational institution.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 793, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) amended, p. 100, § 3, effective August 7.

23-5-116. Governing boards - authority to provide out-of-state courses.

The governing board of any state institution of higher education may offer postsecondary courses at locations outside the state of Colorado for credit applicable toward a degree program. For the purposes of this section, the commission, in consultation with the governing boards, shall determine by policy the definition of out-of-state courses. Each governing board shall promulgate policies and procedures concerning the administration of such courses. The policies and procedures shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

A requirement that no state general fund moneys shall be expended in connection with such out-of-state courses; and

A requirement that credit earned for courses offered outside the state of Colorado shall be applicable toward a degree from the sponsoring institution.

The governing board of any state institution of higher education may offer postsecondary noncredit courses at locations outside the state of Colorado. Each governing board shall promulgate policies and procedures concerning the administration of such courses. The policies and procedures shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

A requirement that no state general fund moneys shall be expended in connection with such out-of-state courses; and

A requirement that noncredit courses may be provided that are not applicable toward a degree from the sponsoring institution.

Each governing board shall notify the Colorado commission on higher education of policies and procedures promulgated pursuant to this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1478, § 19, effective May 28, 2008.)

Each governing board shall provide an annual report to the department of higher education that describes all courses offered outside the boundaries of the state of Colorado. The report shall include a statement of need for the instruction, the geographical location of the instruction, and confirmation that no state funds were used in connection with the out-of-state courses.

This section shall not be construed to limit the authority of the governing boards of state institutions of higher education to offer courses in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 796, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2008:

IP(1), (4), (5), and (6) amended, p. 1478, § 19, effective May 28.

23-5-117. Governing boards - delegation of personnel power.

The governing board of any state-supported institution of higher education, including the Auraria higher education center established in article 70 of this title 23, may delegate all or part of its power over personnel matters, including the power to hire or to fire employees exempt from the personnel system, to the chief executive officer of the institution governed by such board. The governing board may authorize the chief executive officer to delegate to other officers of the institution any power so delegated pursuant to this section. The governing board of each state-supported institution of higher education, except the university of Colorado, Colorado state university, the university of northern Colorado, the Colorado school of mines, Fort Lewis college, Adams state university, Colorado Mesa university, Western Colorado university, or Metropolitan state university of Denver, after consultation with faculty representatives chosen by the faculty, shall prepare, enact, promulgate, administer, and maintain in place policies and practices which afford due process procedures for those faculty members exempt from the state personnel system who are terminated, including terminations resulting from reductions in force.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 767, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 851, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 217, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 794, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1301), ch. 297, p. 1428, § 24, effective August 10; entire section amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1367, § 21, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 759, § 16, effective May 19; entire section amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 426, § 12, effective July 1; entire section amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1271, § 15, effective August 1; entire section amended, (HB 12-1081), ch. 210, p. 902, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3546, § 14, effective July 1.

23-5-118. Selective service registration prerequisite to enrollment.

No male person who is at least seventeen years and nine months of age but younger than twenty-six years of age shall be eligible to enroll at any state-supported institution of higher education until such person has filed with such institution a statement of registration compliance. In such statement of registration compliance, the person shall certify, under oath, either that he is registered with the selective service system pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of the "Military Selective Service Act", 50 U.S.C. App. sec. 453, as amended, or that, for any reason specified in 50 U.S.C. App. sec. 453, he is not required to be registered. If the person does not possess a current Colorado driver's license or Colorado state identification card, which was issued on or after September 4, 2001, the state-supported institution of higher education at which the person enrolls shall verify the person's sworn statement of registration compliance. The state-supported institution of higher education may require the person to provide appropriate documentation in order to verify the person's sworn statement of registration compliance. The person shall be given the opportunity to provide the appropriate documentation proving registration compliance to an agent of the state-supported institution of higher education prior to any disciplinary action being taken.

The governing board of each state-supported institution of higher education shall prescribe the form for such statement of registration compliance. Such statement shall be included in applications for admission to the institution for new and transfer students. Such institution shall require any male person who is at least seventeen years and nine months of age but younger than twenty-six years of age and who is currently attending such institution or has been admitted to such institution but has not given a statement of registration compliance as required by subsection (1) of this section to file a statement of registration compliance when he seeks to enroll for a new academic term.

If a state-supported institution of higher education receives a statement from any person, as required by subsection (1) of this section, certifying that he has registered with the selective service system pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of the "Military Selective Service Act", 50 U.S.C. App. sec. 453, as amended, or that he is exempt from registration for any reason specified in 50 U.S.C. App. sec. 453, other than that he is under seventeen years and nine months of age, such institution shall not require the person to file any further statements. If such institution receives a statement certifying that such person is not required to register pursuant to the provisions of 50 U.S.C. App. sec. 453, because he is under seventeen years and nine months of age, such institution shall require the person to file a new statement of registration compliance each time he seeks to enroll for a new academic term until the institution receives a statement certifying that the person has registered with the selective service system or is exempt from registration for any reason specified in 50 U.S.C. App. sec. 453, other than that he is under seventeen years and nine months of age.

If any person knowingly gives false information in such statement of registration compliance as required pursuant to the provisions of this section, such person commits perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S.

If a student knowingly gives false information under the provisions of this section, the student shall be suspended from the state-supported institution of higher education at which the student is enrolled. If a person knowingly gives false information under the provisions of this section and the person is not enrolled as a student at a state-supported institution of higher education, the person shall be prohibited from enrolling as a student at a state-supported institution of higher education. State-supported institutions of higher education shall be required to provide the person a hearing before an appropriate agent of the state-supported institution of higher education to determine if the person has knowingly given false information under the provisions of this section. A student or prospective student who provides false information under the provisions of this section shall not be eligible to enroll or reenroll until the student provides appropriate documentation proving that he is properly registered with the selective service system.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 849, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2523, § 1, effective January 1, 2004.

23-5-119. Colorado legislative distinguished professor fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1148, § 1, effective May 8.

L. 92:

Entire section repealed, p. 2198, § 2, effective February 25.